Utah statutes.
76-8-505.   False or inconsistent statements -- Proof of falsity of statements -- Irregularities no defense.

(1)  On any prosecution for a violation of Subsection 76-8-502(1) or 76-8-503(1)(a), falsity of a statement may not be established solely through contradiction by the testimony of a single witness.

(2)  In prosecutions for violation of Subsection 76-8-502(2) or 76-8-503(1)(b), it need not be alleged or proved which of the statements are false but only that one or the other is false and not believed by the defendant to be true.

(3)  It is not a defense to a charge under this part that the oath or affirmation was administered or taken in an irregular manner.



Amended by Chapter 324, 1997 General Session

